Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB616.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4962(f.3) introductory paragraph of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4962. Conditions of permits and security for damages.* * *(f.3) Additional authorized travel periods.--Except as otherwise provided under this title, a permitted vehicle, combination or load which is oversized (over-length, over-width or over-height), overweight or both oversized and overweight may operate under a permit [from sunrise to sunset] 24 hours a day, every day of the week, except as follows:* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617